Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 104
NAME

Section

7-104-101. Corporate name. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 749, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(2)(i) added, p. 87, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1313, § 12, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.

7-104-102. Reserved name. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 750, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.